Arkansas, session 2025, HB1525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 18, Chapter 11, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 — Agricultural Impact Remediation Agreements

18-11-901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Agricultural impact remediation agreement" means an
agreement between a commercial renewable energy facility owner and a
landowner as described in this subchapter;
(2) “Agricultural land” means a property from which one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or more of agricultural products were produced and sold, or
normally would have been sold, during a given year;
(3) "Commercial renewable energy facility" means a commercial
wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility;
(4) "Construction" means the installation, preparation for
installation, or repair of a commercial renewable energy facility;
*CRH149*
04-02-2025 14:27:31 CRH149

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 S4/2/25 HB1525
(5) "Deconstruction" means the removal of a commercial renewable
energy facility from the property of a landowner and the restoration of the
property as provided in an agricultural impact remediation agreement; and
(6) "Landowner" means a person:
(A) With an ownership interest in property that is used
for agricultural purposes; and
(B) Who is a party to an underlying agreement for the
construction of a commercial renewable energy facility on the agricultural
land.

18-11-902. Agricultural impact remediation agreement.
(a) Before construction of a commercial renewable energy facility on
agricultural land, the commercial renewable energy facility owner shall enter
into an agricultural impact remediation agreement with the respective
landowner.
(b) The agricultural impact remediation agreement required under
subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) Outline construction and deconstruction standards to ensure
the restoration of the agricultural land upon the conclusion of the
commercial renewable energy facility;
(2)(A) Be completed with a copy provided to the Department of
Agriculture no less than forty-five (45) days before the full notice to
proceed under the construction contract for the commercial renewable energy
facility.
(B) An agricultural remediation agreement in the custody
of the department under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section is not a public
record and is exempt from examination or disclosure under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.;
(3) Be binding on a subsequent commercial renewable energy
facility owner or landowner; and
(4) Provide the landowner with a comprehensive deconstruction
plan that includes adequate proof of financial mechanisms and assurances.
(c) The terms and conditions of the agricultural impact remediation
agreement required under this section may be modified by an underlying
agreement between the landowner and the commercial renewable energy facility
owner.
04-02-2025 14:27:31 CRH149

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 S4/2/25 HB1525
(d) This subchapter or a term in an agricultural impact remediation
agreement shall not be construed to apply to or otherwise impair an
underlying agreement for a commercial renewable energy facility entered into
before the effective date of this subchapter.
(e) This subchapter shall not apply when the commercial renewable
energy facility owner is also the landowner.

/s/Steimel




























04-02-2025 14:27:31 CRH149